src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-verbs-TV.lexc
+V+IteCau+4Pl+1SgO:%>gaangaminnga K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+IteCau+4Pl+2SgO:%>gaangamitsit K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3SgO:%>gaangamikku K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+IteCau+4Pl+1PlO:%>gaangamisigut K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+IteCau+4Pl+2PlO:%>gaangamisi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangamikkik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3PlO:%>gaangamikkit K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Sg+2SgO:%>gukkit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Sg+3SgO:%>gukku K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Sg+4SgO:%>gunni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Sg+2PlO:%>gussi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Sg+3PlO:%>gukkit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Sg+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Sg+1SgO:%>gumma K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Sg+3SgO:%>gukku K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Sg+4SgO:%>gunni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Sg+1PlO:%>gutsigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Sg+3PlO:%>gukkit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Sg+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+3Sg+1SgO:%>ppanga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Sg+2SgO:%>ppatit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Sg+3SgO:%>ppagu K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Sg+4SgO:%>ppani K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Sg+1PlO:%>ppatigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Sg+2PlO:%>ppasi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Sg+3PlO:%>ppagit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Sg+4PlO:%>ppatik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+4Sg+1SgO:%>guninga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Sg+2SgO:%>gunisit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Sg+2SgO:%>gunitit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Sg+3SgO:%>guniuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Sg+1PlO:%>gunisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Sg+2PlO:%>gunisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Sg+3PlO:%>gunigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Pl+2SgO:%>gutsigit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Pl+3SgO:%>gutsigu K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Pl+4SgO:%>gutsinnni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Pl+2PlO:%>gussi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gutsigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Pl+3PlO:%>gutsigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+1Pl+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Pl+1SgO:%>gussinga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Pl+3SgO:%>gussiuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Pl+4SgO:%>gussinni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Pl+1PlO:%>gutsigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gussigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+2Pl+3PlO:%>gussigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa 
+V+Con+2Pl+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+3Pl+1SgO:%>ppannga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Pl+2SgO:%>ppatsit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Pl+3SgO:%>ppassuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Pl+4SgO:%>ppanni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Pl+1PlO:%>ppatigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Pl+2PlO:%>ppasi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>ppatigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+3Pl+3PlO:%>ppatigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel 
+V+Con+3Pl+4PlO:%>ppatik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa !regel
+V+Con+4Pl+1SgO:%>guninnga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Pl+2SgO:%>gunitsit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Pl+3SgO:%>gunikku K_TUQ ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Pl+1PlO:%>gunisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Pl+2PlO:%>gunisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gunikkik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Con+4Pl+3PlO:%>gunikkit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa 
+V+Cont+1SgO:%>llunga K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+2SgO:%>llutit K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+4SgO:%>lluni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+4SgO+TTAAQ:%>llunissaaq # ;
+V+Cont+3SgO:%>llugu K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+1Pl+3SgO:%>llutigu K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+2Pl+3SgO:%>llusiuk K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+1PlO:%>lluta K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+2PlO:%>llusi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>llutigik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+1Pl+3PlO:%>llutigit K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa 
+V+Cont+3PlO:%>llugit K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>llutigik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Cont+2Pl+3PlO:%>llutigit K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa 
+V+Cont+4PlO:%>llutik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+1SgO:%>nanga K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+2SgO:%>nak K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+2SgO:%>natit K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+3SgO:%>nagu K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+1Pl+3SgO:%>natigu K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+3SgO:%>nasiuk K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+1PlO:%>nata K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+2PlO:%>nasi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+3PlO:%>nasigit K_plur ;
+V+ContNeg+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Sg+1SgO:%>gimma K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+1SgO:%>gaanga K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Pl+1SgO:%>gissinga K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+1SgO:%>gaannga K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Sg+2SgO:%>gikkit K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+2SgO:%>gaatit K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Pl+2SgO:%>gitsigit K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+2SgO:%>gaatsit K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Sg+3SgO:%>giga K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Sg+3SgO:%>git K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+3SgO:%>gaa K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+4Sg+3SgO:%>ginni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Pl+3SgO:%>gipput K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Pl+3SgO:%>gissi K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+3SgO:%>gaat K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+4Pl+3SgO:%>gitsik K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Sg+1PlO:%>gitsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+1PlO:%>gaatigut K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Pl+1PlO:%>gitsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+1PlO:%>gaatigut K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Sg+2PlO:%>gissi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+2PlO:%>gaasi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Pl+2PlO:%>gissi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+2PlO:%>gaasi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Sg+3PlO:%>gikka K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Sg+3PlO:%>gitit K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+3PlO:%>gai K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+4Sg+3PlO:%>gini K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Pl+3PlO:%>givut K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Pl+3PlO:%>gisi K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+3PlO:%>gaat K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+4Pl+3PlO:%>gitik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Sg+4SgO:%>ginni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Sg+4SgO:%>ginni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+4SgO:%>gaani K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Pl+4SgO:%>gitsinni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Pl+4SgO:%>gissinni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+4SgO:%>gaanni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Sg+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Sg+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+4PlO:%>gaatik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+1Pl+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+2Pl+4PlO:%>gitsik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+4PlO:%>gaatik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+3SgO:%>gaanni K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Pl+4PlO:%>gaatik K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+3SgO:%>gaanni K ; !flex-tv_vaa
+V+Par+3Sg+3PlO:%>gaanni K_plur ; !flex-tv_vaa

LEXICON flex-tvP_vaa !!= * @CODE@ 
+Gram/TV:   flex-tvP_vaa2 ;
